District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
26 be cited as the “Kidnapping Amendment Act of 2025”.
27 Sec. 2. Title 22 is amended as follows:
28 (a) Chapter 20 is amended to read as follows:
29 “Title 22, Chapter 20. Kidnapping.
30 “§ 22-2001. Definitions.
31 “For the purposes of this chapter:
32 “(1) “Block”, and other parts of speech, including “blocks” and “blocking”, mean
33 “to render safe passage through a space difficult or impossible.
34 “(2) “Bodily injury” means physical pain, physical injury, illness, or impairment
35 of physical condition.

36 “(3) “Coercive threat” means a communication that, unless the complainant
37 complies, any person will do any of the following:
38 “(A) Engage in conduct that, in fact, constitutes:
39 “(i) An offense against persons; or
40 “(ii) A property offense;
41 “(B) Take or withhold action as a public official, or cause a public official
42 to take or withhold action;
43 “(C) Accuse a person of a crime;
44 “(D) Expose a secret, publicize an asserted fact, or distribute a photograph,
45 video or audio recording, regardless of the truth or authenticity of the secret, fact, or item,
46 that tends to subject another person to, or perpetuate:
47 “(i) Hatred, contempt, ridicule, or other significant injury to
48 personal reputation; or
49 “(ii) Significant injury to credit or business reputation;
50 “(E) Notify a federal, state, or local government agency or official of, or
51 publicize, another person’s immigration or citizenship status;
52 “(F) Facilitate or control a person’s access to an addictive or controlled
53 substance, or a prescription medication;
54 “(G) Engage in fraud or deception;
55 “(H) Cause any harm that is sufficiently serious, under all the
56 circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of the same background and in the same
57 circumstances as the complainant to comply; or
58 “(I) Knowingly participate in conduct with the intent to cause a person to
59 believe that they are the property of a person or business and that would cause a

60 reasonable person in that person’s circumstances to believe that they are the property of a
61 person or business.
62 ‘(4) (A) “Deceive”, and other parts of speech, including “deception”, mean:
63 “(i) Creating or reinforcing a false impression as to a material fact,
64 including a false impression as to an intention to perform future actions;
65 “(ii) Preventing another person from acquiring material
66 information;
67 “(iii) Failing to correct a false impression as to a material fact,
68 including false impressions as to intention, which the person previously created or
69 reinforced, or which influences another to whom they stand in a fiduciary or confidential
70 relationship; or
71 “(iv) For property offenses, failing to disclose a lien, adverse
72 claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of property which they transfer or
73 encumber in consideration for property, whether or not it is a matter of official record.
74 “(B) The term “deceive” does not include puffing statements that are
75 unlikely to deceive ordinary persons.
76 “(C) Deception as to a person’s intention to perform a future act shall not
77 be inferred from the fact alone that they did not subsequently perform the act.
78 “(5) “Effective consent” means consent other than consent induced by physical
79 force, an explicit or implicit coercive threat, or deception.
80 “(6) “Incapacitated individual” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 21-
81 2011(11).
82 “(7) “Person with legal authority over the complainant” means:
83 “(A) When the complainant is a person under 18 years of age:

84 “(i) A parent, or a person acting in the place of a parent under civil
85 law, who is responsible for the health, welfare, or supervision of the complainant; or
86 “(ii) Someone who is acting with the effective consent of such a
87 parent or such a person; or
88 “(B) When the complainant is an incapacitated individual:
89 “(i) A court-appointed guardian to the complainant; or
90 “(ii) Someone who is acting with the effective consent of such a
91 guardian.
92 “(8) “Serious bodily injury” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-
93 404.01(d).
94 “(9) “Substantially confines or moves” means that the complainant was either:
95 “(A) Moved at least 20 feet away from the complainant’s original
96 location; or
97 “(B) Confined or moved for at least 10 minutes.”.
98 (b) Chapter 22 is amended to read as follows:
99 “§ 22-2002. Kidnapping.
100 “(a) First degree. An actor commits first degree kidnapping when the actor:
101 “(1) Knowingly and substantially confines or moves the complainant, or
102 causes the complainant to be substantially confined or moved;
103 “(2) By means of:
104 “(A) Causing bodily injury to the complainant or by using physical
105 force;
106 “(B) Making an explicit or implicit coercive threat;
107 “(C) Deception;

108 “(D) Securing, locking, or blocking any door, passageway, or other
109 means of egress; or
110 “(E) With explicit or implicit acquiescence of the complainant,
111 when the actor is:
112 “(i) Reckless as to the facts that:
113 “(I) The complainant is an incapacitated individual;
114 and
115 “(II) A person with legal authority over the
116 complainant who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent
117 to the confinement or movement; or
118 “(ii) In fact, 18 years of age or older and reckless as to the
119 facts that:
120 “(I) The complainant is under 16 years of age and 4
121 years younger than the actor; and
122 “(II) A person with legal authority over the
123 complainant who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent
124 to the confinement or movement; and
125 “(3) With intent to:
126 “(A) Hold the complainant for ransom or reward;
127 “(B) Use the complainant as a shield or hostage;
128 “(C) Facilitate the commission of any felony or flight thereafter;
129 “(D) Inflict death or serious bodily injury upon the complainant;
130 “(E) Commit a sexual offense defined in Chapter 30 of Title 22
131 against the complainant;

132 “(F) Cause any person to believe that the complainant will not be
133 released without suffering death, serious bodily injury, or a sex offense defined in
134 Chapter 30 of Title 22;
135 “(G) Permanently leave a person with legal authority over the
136 complainant without custody of the complainant; or
137 “(H) Confine or move the complainant for 24 hours or more.
138 “(b) Second degree. An actor commits second degree kidnapping when the actor:
139 “(1) Knowingly and substantially confines or moves the complainant, or
140 causes the complainant to be substantially confined or moved;
141 “(2) By means of:
142 “(A) Causing bodily injury to the complainant or by using physical
143 force;
144 “(B) Making an explicit or implicit coercive threat;
145 “(C) Deception;
146 “(D) Securing, locking, or blocking any door, passageway, or other
147 means of egress; or
148 “(E) With explicit or implicit acquiescence of the complainant,
149 when the actor is:
150 “(i) Reckless as to the facts that:
151 “(I) The complainant is an incapacitated individual;
152 and
153 “(II) A person with legal authority over the
154 complainant who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent
155 to the confinement or movement; or

156 “(ii) In fact, 18 years of age or older and reckless as to the
157 facts that:
158 “(I) The complainant is under 16 years of age and 4
159 years younger than the actor; and
160 “(II) A person with legal authority over the
161 complainant who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent
162 to the confinement or movement; and
163 “(3) With intent to:
164 “(A) Inflict bodily injury upon the complainant;
165 “(B) Cause any person to believe that the complainant will not be
166 released without suffering bodily injury;
167 “(C) Commit any criminal offense; or
168 “(D) Facilitate the commission of any criminal offense or flight
169 thereafter.
170 “(c) Defense. It is a defense to liability under subsection (a)(3)(G) and (H) of this
171 section when the complainant is, in fact, under 18 years of age and the actor is either:
172 “(1) A close relative or a former legal guardian who had authority to
173 control the complainant’s freedom of movement who:
174 “(A) Acts with intent to assume full responsibility for the care and
175 supervision of the complainant; and
176 “(B) Does not cause bodily injury or use an explicit or implicit
177 coercive threat to cause the confinement or movement; or
178 “(2) A person who reasonably believes they are acting at the direction of a
179 close relative who:

180 “(A) Acts with intent that the close relative will assume full
181 responsibility for the care and supervision of the complainant; and
182 “(B) Does not cause bodily injury, commit a sexual offense as
183 defined in Chapter 30 of Title 22, or use an explicit or implicit coercive threat to cause
184 the confinement or movement.
185 “(d) Penalties.
186 “(1) Any person convicted of first degree kidnapping shall be fined not
187 more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 30
188 years, or both.
189 “(2) Any person convicted of second degree kidnapping shall be fined not
190 more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 15
191 years, or both.
192 “(e) Multiple convictions for related offenses. Where multiple convictions for first
193 degree kidnapping or second degree kidnapping and another offense arise from the same
194 act or course of conduct, the sentencing court shall follow the procedures specified in §
195 23-112.
196 “(f) Unanimity. Although there must be sufficient proof that an actor acted either
197 with the intent delineated in subsection (a)(3) of this section to sustain liability for first
198 degree kidnapping, or with the intent delineated in subsection (b)(3) of this section to
199 sustain liability for second degree kidnapping, there is no requirement that the factfinder
200 determine which specific purpose described in either subsection (a)(3)(A)-(H), or
201 subsection (b)(3)(A)-(D), was intended by the actor, provided that the factfinder
202 determines that the actor acted with at least one of the applicable specific purposes. If a
203 jury is the trier of fact, members of the jury are not required to agree unanimously on

204 which specific purpose was intended by the actor, provided that the members of the jury
205 agree unanimously that the actor acted with at least one specific purpose described in
206 either subsection (a)(3)(A)-(H), or subsection (b)(3)(A)-(D), as applicable.
207 “§ 22-2003. Criminal restraint.
208 “(a) Offense. An actor commits criminal restraint when the actor knowingly and
209 substantially confines or moves the complainant, or causes the complainant to be
210 substantially confined or moved:
211 (1) By means of:
212 “(A) Causing bodily injury to the complainant or by using physical
213 force;
214 “(B) Making an explicit or implicit coercive threat; or
215 “(C) Deception; or
216 “(D) Securing, locking, or blocking any door, passageway, or other
217 means of egress; or
218 “(2) By any means, including with acquiescence of the complainant, when
219 the actor is:
220 “(A) Reckless as to the facts that:
221 “(i) The complainant is an incapacitated individual; and
222 “(ii) A person with legal authority over the complainant
223 who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent to the
224 confinement or movement; or
225 “(B) In fact, 18 years of age or older and reckless as to the facts
226 that:

227 “(i) The complainant is under 16 years of age and 4 years
228 younger than the actor; and
229 “(ii) A person with legal authority over the complainant
230 who is acting consistent with that authority has not given effective consent to the
231 confinement or movement.
232 “(b) Defenses.
233 “(1) It is a defense that the complainant is, in fact, under 18 years of age,
234 and the actor is:
235 “(A) A close relative or a former legal guardian who had authority
236 to control the complainant’s freedom of movement who:
237 “(i) Acts with intent to assume full responsibility for the
238 care and supervision of the complainant; and
239 “(ii) Does not cause bodily injury or use an explicit or
240 implicit coercive threat to cause the confinement or movement; or
241 “(B) A person who reasonably believes they are acting at the
242 direction of a close relative who:
243 “(i) Acts with intent that the close relative will assume full
244 responsibility for the care and supervision of the complainant; and
245 “(ii) Does not cause bodily injury or use an explicit or
246 implicit coercive threat to cause the confinement or movement.
247 “(2) It is a defense to liability under subsection (a)(2) of this section that,
248 in fact, the actor:
249 “(A) Is a transportation worker who moves the complainant while
250 in the course of the worker’s official duties; or

251 “(B) Is a person who moves the complainant solely by persuading
252 the complainant to go to a location open to the general public to engage in a commercial
253 or other legal activity.
254 “(c) Affirmative defenses.
255 “(1) It is an affirmative defense to liability under subsection (a)(1)(C) of
256 this section that the actor, in fact:
257 “(A) Lacks the complainant’s effective consent solely because of
258 deception by the actor; and
259 “(B) Does not confine or move the complainant with intent to use
260 bodily injury or an explicit or implicit coercive threat if the deception should fail.
261 “(2) It is an affirmative defense to liability under subsection (a)(2) of this
262 section that the actor, in fact, reasonably believes that a person with legal authority over
263 the complainant would have given effective consent to the conduct constituting the
264 offense.
265 “(d) Penalty. Any person convicted of criminal restraint shall be fined not more
266 than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned not more than 180 days, or
267 both..
268 “(e) Multiple convictions for related offenses. Where multiple convictions for
269 criminal restraint and another offense arise from the same act or course of conduct, the
270 sentencing court shall follow the procedures specified in § 23-112.
271 “ § 22–2004. Attempts.
272 “Any person who attempts to commit an offense under this subchapter shall be
273 imprisoned for not more than 1/2 of the maximum prison sentence authorized for the offense
274 and, in addition, may be fined an amount not to exceed 1/2 of the maximum fine authorized for

275 the offense.”.
276 ` Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
277 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
278 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
279 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
280 Sec. 4. Effective date.
281 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
282 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 60-day period of congressional review as
283 provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
284 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)), and publication in the District of
285 Columbia Register.